Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Registration of Trailers

186.650.
Definitions for KRS 186.650 to 186.700.

As used in KRS

186.650

to

186.700

:

A “trailer” means any vehicle designed for carrying persons or property and being drawn by a motor vehicle being so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle.

“Semitrailer” means any vehicle designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and is so constructed that some part of its weight and some part of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle, except that:

“Semitrailer” shall not include any vehicle designed for carrying persons or property and being drawn by a motor vehicle registered according to the provisions of KRS 186.050(4)(a) and used by a farmer only for transporting persons, food, provender, feed, machinery, livestock, material and supplies necessary for his farming operation, and the products grown on his farm.

“Manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one (1) or more sections, which:

Is eight (8) body feet or more in width and forty (40) body feet or more in length when in the traveling mode;

Has three hundred twenty (320) or more square feet when erected on site;

Is built on a permanent chassis;

Is designed to be used as a dwelling, with or without a permanent foundation, when connected to the required utilities;

Includes plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems; and

May be used as a place of residence, business, profession, or trade by the owner, lessee or their assigns, and may consist of one (1) or more units that can be attached or joined together to comprise an integral unit or condominium structure.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle. The basic entities are: travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, and motor home;

A travel trailer is a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use. It shall be a size and weight which shall not require special highway movement permits when drawn by a motorized vehicle. It shall have a living area of less than two hundred twenty (220) square feet, excluding built-in equipment (such as wardrobes, closets, cabinets, kitchen units, or fixtures) and bath and toilet rooms. The exterior area of a travel trailer shall be less than three hundred twenty (320) square feet.

A camping trailer is a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the camp site to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use.

A truck camper is a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor, and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pick-up truck.

A motor home is a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use built on or permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van which is an integral part of the completed vehicle.

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 1; 1962, ch. 62, § 18; 1966, ch. 255, § 172; 1974, ch. 90, § 3; 1974, ch. 368, § 3; 1982, ch. 395, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 42, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

186.655.
Time of registration — Application — Affidavit — Sales tax.

Before any owner or operator of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle may operate upon the highways, the owner shall apply for registration to the county clerk of the county in which he resides or in which the vehicles are principally operated. The application shall be retained by the clerk and shall be accompanied by:

A manufacturer’s certificate of origin, if the application is for the registration of a new trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle;

The owner’s registration receipt, if the trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle was last registered in this state;

A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt, if last registered in another state that does not require the owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

A certificate of title, if last registered in another state that requires the owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

An affidavit from the owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle assembled or constructed for his personal use on the highways; or

An affidavit from the owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle where the bill of sale for the vehicle has been lost, destroyed, or stolen.

The affidavit required in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section shall contain the owner’s name, address, date, brief description, and a statement that the trailer was constructed by the owner for use on the highways and additional information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

The affidavit required in paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section shall contain the owner’s name, address, date, make, year made, serial or identification number, name of the person from whom purchased, date of purchase, a statement that the person making the affidavit is the sole owner, the circumstances under which the bill of sale was lost, destroyed, or stolen, and additional information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

After initial registration of his vehicles in this state, the owner shall register his trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle on or before April 1 of each year. Registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 2; 1958, ch. 70, § 26; 1962, ch. 62, § 19; 1966, ch. 139, § 15; 1976, ch. 133, § 15; 1976, ch. 236, § 1; 1982, ch. 395, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 42, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 607, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 252, Part XIV, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

186.660.
Trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle last registered in another state.

A trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle last registered in another state and purchased by a person for operation in this state shall be first registered in this state by and in the name of the purchaser and not in the name of the seller.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 3, effective January 1, 1957; 1982, ch. 395, § 12, effective July 15, 1982.

186.665.
Inability to register trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle before April 1.

If an owner because of sickness or absence from the state is unable to renew the registration of his trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle on or before April 1, he will be deemed to have complied with the law, if before operating the trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle in this state he registers it at some later date and pays the fee for the full year, just as though he had renewed the registration on or before April 1. The owner shall file with the application an affidavit showing sickness or absence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 4; 1966, ch. 139, § 16; 1982, ch. 395, § 13, effective July 15, 1982.

186.670.
Application blanks — Registration receipt and plate.

The application blank shall contain blank spaces for, and the applicant shall fill in the owner’s name and post office address, make of the trailer, semitrailer, mobile home or recreational vehicle, and serial or identification number. Every application shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee.

Upon filing application and paying the fee as provided by law, said owner shall be given a receipt containing the registration number and the information included in the application and one (1) plate for the registration year bearing said number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, §§ 5, 6, effective January 1, 1957; 1982, ch. 395, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

186.675.
Annual fees — Permanent registration and fee.

The annual registration fee for trailers and semitrailers which are drawn by motor vehicles required to be licensed under KRS 186.050(1) shall be four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50). The annual registration fee for trailers and semitrailers which are drawn by motor vehicles required to be licensed under KRS 186.050(3) to (13) shall be nineteen dollars and fifty cents ($19.50).

The provisions of KRS

186.650

to

186.700

shall not apply to privately owned and operated trailers used for the transportation of:

Boats;

Luggage;

Personal effects;

Farm products, farm supplies, or farm equipment;

All-terrain vehicles as defined in KRS 189.010(24);

Wildlife as defined in KRS 150.010(45) that the owner or operator of the trailer has obtained while hunting; and

Firearms or other supplies used in conjunction with hunting wildlife.

The registration fee for mobile homes and recreational vehicles shall be nine dollars and fifty cents ($9.50) except the registration fee for camping trailers, travel trailers, and truck campers shall be four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50). The clerk shall issue the registration plate furnished by the cabinet and shall be paid for this service the sum of one dollar ($1).

Beginning April 1, 1993, at the request of the owner, trailers and semitrailers which are drawn by motor vehicles required to be licensed under KRS 186.050(3) to (13) may be permanently registered, except the registration shall expire when the trailer or semitrailer is sold or when it is otherwise permanently removed from service by the owner. The registration fee for the period shall be ninety-eight dollars ($98). The clerk shall issue the registration plate furnished by the cabinet and shall be paid for this service the sum of three dollars ($3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 7; 1958, ch. 70, § 27; 1966, ch. 139, § 17; 1978, ch. 84, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 395, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 14, § 1, effective April 1, 1993; 1994, ch. 428, § 32, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 460, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 129, § 9, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 115, § 11, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 167, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2020). A reference to “KRS 150.010(45)” in subsection (2)(f) of this statute has been changed to “KRS 150.010(46)” to conform with renumbering of definitions in that statute during the codification of 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 2.

(6/27/2019). This statute was amended by
2019 Ky. Acts chs. 115 and
167, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

186.680.
Registration fees for portion of year.

If a person becomes the owner of a trailer, semitrailer, or recreational vehicle after April 1 of any year, and for that reason registers for only part of a year, the registration fee shall be as many twelfths of the annual fee as there are unexpired months in the registration year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 8; 1966, ch. 139, § 18; 1982, ch. 395, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 42, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

186.685.
Registration plates — Design.

The cabinet shall prescribe a plate of practical form and size which shall contain only the registration number and the word “Trailer” and the abbreviation of the word “Kentucky”.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 9, effective January 1, 1957.

186.690.
Application of KRS 186.045 and 186.070 to 186.240.

KRS

186.045

and

186.070

to

186.240

shall apply to the registration of trailers, semitrailers, and recreational vehicles if practicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 10; 1966, ch. 139, § 19; 1982, ch. 395, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 42, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a bank made a loan on a house trailer and recorded the financing statement but did not present a registration certificate for the lien to be recorded on, if at a later date the registration receipt for the house trailer is presented for recording in that county the lien information should be recorded on such receipt.

OAG 64-563

.

Where a bank made a loan on a house trailer and recorded the financing statement but did not present a registration certificate for the lien to be recorded on, if a subsequent loan is made by another and the registration receipt is presented the first loan is classified as the first mortgage against the trailer.

OAG 64-563

.

Since the clerk is not personally responsible for determining how the house trailer is being used, he may rely upon the secured party’s representation that it is or is not subject to registration, and may rely upon the secured party’s representation that a financing statement is all that is required, or if the secured party also presents a registration receipt, he may note the lien thereon.

OAG 79-57

.

186.695.
Exemptions.

Trailers, semitrailers, and manufactured homes as defined in KRS

186.650

to

186.700

are expressly exempted from KRS

138.450

to

138.470

.

Trailers and semitrailers in transit between a manufacturing plant and dealer’s place of business; between a manufacturing plant and user’s place of residence; or between a dealer’s place of business and user’s place of residence and farm equipment pulled or towed by a motor vehicle not required to be licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 186 shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

186.650

to

186.700

.

Recreational vehicles and manufactured homes in transit between a manufacturing plant and dealer’s place of business shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

186.650

to

186.700

.

Manufactured homes shall be exempt from the provisions of KRS

186.650

to

186.700

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, §§ 11, 11a; 1966, ch. 120, § 1; 1982, ch. 395, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 42, §§ 5, 8, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 42, secs. 5 and 8 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

186.700.
Department of Vehicle Regulation to administer KRS 186.650 to 186.700 — Cooperation with Transportation Cabinet.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall administer the provisions of KRS

186.650

to

186.700

, except that the Transportation Cabinet shall require an accounting by the clerk for the moneys received by the clerk under the provisions of KRS

186.675

and for all receipts, forms, plates and insignia consigned to him, and the clerk shall forward these moneys to the Transportation Cabinet in accordance with the other provisions of this chapter. The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall include on the registration receipts such information as shall be required by the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 12; 1962, ch. 62, § 20.

186.750.
Definitions for KRS 186.750 and 186.752.

As used in this section and KRS

186.752

:

“Bi-fuel system” means the power system of motor vehicles that are powered by gasoline and either CNG or LNG;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Clean transportation fuel” means:

Propane, CNG, LNG, bi-fuel systems, or electricity when they are used as motor vehicle fuel; or

Other transportation fuels determined by the division to be comparable with respect to emissions;

“Compressed natural gas” or “CNG” means pipeline quality natural gas that is compressed and provided for sale or use as a motor vehicle fuel;

“Conversion” means:

Repowering a motor vehicle or special mobile equipment by replacing its original gasoline or diesel powered engine with one capable of operating on clean transportation fuel; or

Retrofitting a motor vehicle or special mobile equipment with parts that enable its original gasoline or diesel powered engine to operate on clean transportation fuel;

“Division” means the Division for Air Quality within the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Liquefied natural gas,” “liquid natural gas,” or “LNG” means pipeline-quality natural gas treated to remove water, hydrogen sulfide, carbon dioxide, and other components that will freeze and condensed into liquid form for sale or use as a motor vehicle fuel;

“Liquefied petroleum gas,” “propane,” or “LPG” means a hydrocarbon mixture produced as a by-product of natural gas processing and petroleum refining and condensed into liquid form for sale or use as a motor fuel;

“Motor vehicle” means a self-propelled device by which a person or property may be transported upon a public highway, except a device moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or which derives its power from overhead wires; and

“Special mobile equipment” means a motor vehicle or mobile equipment not designed or used primarily to transport people, including but not limited to construction or maintenance equipment.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 116, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

186.752.
Safety inspection required for vehicles converted to the use of natural gas after January 1, 2013 — Certification to owner and cabinet — Administrative regulations — Directions to cabinet.

The owner of a motor vehicle that has been converted after January 1, 2013, to operate on either CNG or LNG alone or in a bi-fuel system shall have the motor vehicle inspected to ascertain compliance with relevant federal safety standards covering the use of these fuels. The safety inspection shall occur:

At the time of the conversion;

Every three (3) years or thirty-six thousand (36,000) miles after the conversion, whichever occurs first; and

Following any collision in which any vehicle involved is traveling at five (5) miles per hour or greater.

The owner of a motor vehicle originally designed and manufactured to use compressed or liquid natural gas as a fuel shall have it inspected for safety following any collision in which any vehicle involved is traveling at five (5) miles per hour or greater.

A person who performs the conversion of a motor vehicle to operate on either CNG or LNG alone or in a bi-fuel system shall certify to the owner of the motor vehicle and the cabinet that the conversion does not tamper with, circumvent, or otherwise affect any existing motor vehicle emissions or diagnostic systems, except as necessary to complete the conversion.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section to:

Qualify persons to perform safety inspections on converted motor vehicles;

Modify or adopt for state use any federal safety standards, if necessary; and

Identify motor vehicles that have been converted to operate on clean transportation fuels and ensure compliance with the safety, emissions, and efficiency requirements of this section and applicable administrative regulations.

In promulgating administrative regulations, the cabinet shall consider:

Directing that inspections use equipment which is widely available in the state; and

Creating a regulatory framework that encourages the conversion and sale of motor vehicles that operate on CNG, LNG, or a bi-fuel system.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 116, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.